Hawaii statutes.
[§321-404] Public information
monitoring system. Within the program, the department of health shall
investigate foodhandling practices which appear to represent poor food safety
techniques, and shall develop ways in which the public can gain information on
food safety and can report practices which appear to represent poor food safety
techniques. [L 1992, c 219, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next